Maine, session 132, LD1306.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1571, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 208, §1, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
This subsection is repealed July 1, 2025 2027.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1571, sub-§3-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 208, §2, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
This subsection is effective July 1, 2025 2027.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §1572, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 208, §4, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2025 2027.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1435(03)